Utah statutes.
62A-3-108.   Allocation of funds to local area agencies -- Formulas.
(1)  The board shall establish by rule formulas for allocating funds to local
area agencies through contracts to provide programs and services in accordance
with this part based on need.  Determination of need shall be based on the
number of eligible persons located in the local area which the division is
authorized to serve, unless federal regulations require otherwise or the board
establishes, by valid and accepted data, that other defined factors are
relevant and reliable indicators of need. Formulas established by the board
shall include a differential to compensate for additional costs of providing
services in rural areas.
(2) Formulas established under Subsection (1) shall be in effect on or before
July 1, 1998, and apply to all state and federal funds appropriated by the
Legislature to the division for local area agencies, but does not apply to:
(a)  funds that local area agencies receive from sources other than the
division;
(b)  funds that local area agencies receive from the division to operate a
specific program within its jurisdiction which is available to all residents
of the state;
(c)  funds that a local area agency receives from the division to meet a need
that exists only within that local area; and
(d)  funds that a local area agency receives from the division for research
projects.
